apertium-ky-en.ky.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!   M O R P H O L O G I C A L · T R A N S D U C E R · F O R · K Y R G Y Z   !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

Multichar_Symbols
 
%<n%>       ! Noun
%<np%>      ! Proper noun
%<adj%>     ! Adjective
%<det%>     ! Determiner
%<adv%>     ! Adverb
%<num%>     ! Numeral
%<v%>       ! Verb
%<prn%>     ! Pronoun
%<post%>    ! Postposition
%<postadv%> ! Postadverb
%<part%>    ! Particle
%<abbr%>    ! Abbreviation
%<ij%>      ! Interjection 
%<cnjcoo%>  ! Coordinating conjunction
%<cnjadv%>  ! Adverbial conjunction
%<cnjsub%>  ! Subordinating conjunction

%<iv%>      ! Intransitive 
%<tv%>      ! Transitive
%<TD%>      ! Transitivity to be determined

%<nom%>     ! Nominative
%<acc%>     ! Accusative
%<dat%>     ! Dative
%<gen%>     ! Genitive
%<loc%>     ! Locative
%<abl%>     ! Ablative

%<rloc%>    ! Relativised locative -DAGI

%<m%>       ! Masculine
%<f%>       ! Feminine

%<pers%>    ! Personal 
%<dem%>     ! Demonstrative
%<ind%>     ! Indefinite
%<qnt%>     ! Quantifier
%<itg%>     ! Interrogative
%<ref%>     ! Reflexive

%<cmpd%>    ! Compound

%<sg%>      ! Singular
%<pl%>      ! Plural

%<p1%>      ! First person
%<p2%>      ! Second person
%<p3%>      ! Third person

%<px1sg%>   ! Possessive, first person singular
%<px2sg%>   ! Possessive, second person singular
%<px3sg%>   ! Possessive, third person singular
%<px1pl%>   ! Possessive, first person plural
%<px2pl%>   ! Possessive, second person plural
%<px3pl%>   ! Possessive, third person plural
%<px%>      ! General possessive -ныкы

%<ant%>     ! Anthroponym (name of person)
%<cog%>     ! Cognomen (second, or family name)
%<top%>     ! Toponym
%<org%>     ! Organisation name

%<frm%>     ! Formal
 
%<dem%>     ! Demonstrative
%<neg%>     ! Negative
%<exi%>     ! Existential
%<qst%>     ! Question

%<cv_impf%> ! Converb imperfect, -E
%<cv_perf%> ! Converb perfect, -Iп
%<cv_irre%> ! Converb irrealis, -Eт
%<cv_fut%>  ! Converb future, -Aр
%<cv_pur%>  ! Converb purpose, -GAнI

%<pres%>    ! Present tense
%<aor%>     ! Aorist, -E
%<cond%>    ! Conditional, -сA
%<opt%>     ! Optative, -мAк>чI
%<past%>    ! Past tense
%<pih%>     ! Past habitual
%<pot%>     ! Potential, -чUдAй
%<ifi%>     ! Definite past 
%<fut%>     ! Future tense, -AAр
%<pp%>      ! Past participle, -GAн
%<pp2%>     ! Past participle, -GAнI
%<plist%>   ! Listing participle
%<inf%>     ! Verbal noun, -үү
%<inf2%>    ! Verbal noun, -иш

%<sent%>    ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>    ! Hyphen
%<cm%>      ! Comma
%<pst%>     ! Positive level of comparison
%<comp%>    ! Comparative level of comparison 
%<sup%>	    ! Superlative level of comparison 
%<ord%>     ! Ordinal
%<apprx%>   ! Approximal


%{E%}       ! Realised as 'а', 'е', 'о', 'ө', 'й' 
%{A%}       ! Realised as 'а', 'е', 'о', 'ө' 
%{I%}       ! Realised as 'ы', 'и', 'у', 'ү'
%{U%}       ! Realised as 'у', 'ү'
%{G%}       ! Realised as 'г', 'к', 'ң', 'н'
%{D%}       ! Realised as 'д', 'т', 'н'
%{M%}       ! Realised as 'м', 'б', 'п'
%{N%}       ! Realised as 'н', 'д', 'т'
%{L%}       ! Realised as 'л', 'д', 'т'
%{B%}       ! Realised as 'б', 'в' **CHECK**


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                  C O N T I N U A T I O N      L E X I C A               !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

!NumeralList ;
Particles ;
Postpositions ;
Conjunctions ;
Determiners ;
Pronouns ;
Postadverbs ;
Numerals ;
NounStems ;
PropernounStems ;
AdjecStems ;
AdvStems ;
VerbStems ;
Punctuation ;
Interjections ;
Abbreviations ;

LEXICON CASES-SHORT-ACC
%<nom%>: # ;                   ! -     -      -
%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}н # ;      ! -нын, -нин, -дын, -дин, -тын, -тин, -нун, -нүн, -дун, -дүн, -тун, -түн
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} # ;       ! -га, -ка, -ге, -ке, -го, -ко, -гө, -кө
%<acc%>:%>%{N%} # ;            ! -ны, -ни, -ды, -ди, -ты, -ти, -ну, -нү, -ду, -дү, -ту, -тү
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} # ;       ! -да, -де, -та, -те, -до, -дө, -то, -тө
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н # ;      ! -дан, -ден, -тан, -тен, -дон, -дөн, -тон, -төн
%<rloc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} # ;

LEXICON OBL-CASES
%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}н # ;      ! -нын, -нин, -дын, -дин, -тын, -тин, -нун, -нүн, -дун, -дүн, -тун, -түн
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} # ;       ! -га, -ка, -ге, -ке, -го, -ко, -гө, -кө
%<acc%>:%>%{N%}%{I%} # ;       ! -ны, -ни, -ды, -ди, -ты, -ти, -ну, -нү, -ду, -дү, -ту, -тү
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} # ;       ! -да, -де, -та, -те, -до, -дө, -то, -тө
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н # ;      ! -дан, -ден, -тан, -тен, -дон, -дөн, -тон, -төн
%<rloc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} # ;

LEXICON CASES
%<nom%>: # ;                 ! -     -      -
%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}н # ;      ! -нын, -нин, -дын, -дин, -тын, -тин, -нун, -нүн, -дун, -дүн, -тун, -түн
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} # ;       ! -га, -ка, -ге, -ке, -го, -ко, -гө, -кө
%<acc%>:%>%{N%}%{I%} # ;       ! -ны, -ни, -ды, -ди, -ты, -ти, -ну, -нү, -ду, -дү, -ту, -тү
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} # ;       ! -да, -де, -та, -те, -до, -дө, -то, -тө
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н # ;      ! -дан, -ден, -тан, -тен, -дон, -дөн, -тон, -төн
%<rloc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} # ;

LEXICON GEN-POS
CASES ;
%<px%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}к%{I%} CASES-SHORT-ACC ; 

LEXICON GEN-POS-SHORT-ACC
CASES-SHORT-ACC ;
%<px%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}к%{I%} CASES-SHORT-ACC ; 

LEXICON POSSESSION
GEN-POS ;
%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м GEN-POS ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң GEN-POS ; 
%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з GEN-POS ; 
%<px3sg%>:%>с%{I%} GEN-POS-SHORT-ACC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з GEN-POS ; 
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{A%}р GEN-POS ; 
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р GEN-POS;
%<px3pl%>:%>с%{I%} GEN-POS-SHORT-ACC ;

LEXICON N-INFL-SG

%<n%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON N-INFL

%<n%>: POSSESSION ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: CASES  ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: CASES  ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: CASES ;

LEXICON NP-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>: CASES ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-ASSR

%<np%>%<top%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: POSSESSION ;


LEXICON ADJ-LEVELS

%<pst%>: # ;
%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{A%}к # ;

LEXICON ADJ

%<adj%>: ADJ-LEVELS ;

LEXICON ADJ-ORD

%<adj%>%<ord%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV-ITG

%<adv%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>: # ;

LEXICON POST

%<post%>: # ;

LEXICON CA

%<cnjadv%>: # ;

LEXICON CS

%<cnjsub%>: # ;

LEXICON CC

%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON POSTADV

%<postadv%>: # ;

LEXICON PART 

%<part%>: # ;

LEXICON PART-PERS-COP

%<part%>: V-PERS-COP ;

LEXICON PART-PERS-PAST 

%<part%>: V-PERS-PAST ;

LEXICON ABBR

%<abbr%>: # ;

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;


LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-IND

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON NumeralList

%0 NumeralLoop ;
1 NumeralLoop ;
2 NumeralLoop ;
3 NumeralLoop ;
4 NumeralLoop ;
5 NumeralLoop ;
6 NumeralLoop ;
7 NumeralLoop ;
8 NumeralLoop ;
9 NumeralLoop ;

LEXICON NumeralLoop
NumeralList ;
%. NumeralList  ;
%, NumeralList  ;
%%%<num%>:%% CASES ;
Num ;

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN

%<num%>: CASES ;

LEXICON NUM

%<num%>: POSSESSION ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} POSSESSION ;
%<num%>%<apprx%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й POSSESSION ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-BUL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:бул # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:мунун # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:муну # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:буга # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:мында # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:мындан # ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:бул%>л%{A%}р CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-OSOL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:л # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:нун # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ну # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:го # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ндо # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ндон # ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;

LEXICON NounStems
аксакал N-INFL ; 
археолог N-INFL ; 
атак-даңк N-INFL ; 
авиапочта N-INFL ; 
бала N-INFL-SG ; ! "child"
бала%<n%>%<pl%>:балдар POSSESSION ; ! "children"
баян N-INFL ; 
мектеп N-INFL ; ! "school"
акыркы N-INFL ; 
наристе N-INFL ; 
бөрк N-INFL ; 
дарс N-INFL ; 
тыт N-INFL ; 
этнолог N-INFL ; 
физика N-INFL ; 
кекирик N-INFL ; 
айбан N-INFL ; 
гипнотизм N-INFL ; 
камуфляж N-INFL ; 
кетчуп N-INFL ; 
космополит N-INFL ; 
легионер N-INFL ; 
маникюр N-INFL ; 
мисс N-INFL ; 
оптимизм N-INFL ; 
позитивизм N-INFL ; 
симфония N-INFL ; 
тен N-INFL ; 
жатакана N-INFL ; 
үстү N-INFL ; 
ашпоз N-INFL ; 
мүйүз N-INFL ; 
жардамдашуу N-INFL ; 
этикетка N-INFL ; 
сот N-INFL ; 
ысрап N-INFL ; 
сактоо N-INFL ;
LEXICON PropernounStems
Грузия NP-TOP ;
Орусия NP-TOP ;
Германия NP-TOP ;
Испания NP-TOP ;
Улуу% Британия NP-TOP ;
Кытай NP-TOP ;
Ош NP-TOP ;
Кыргыз% ССР NP-TOP-ASSR ;
Кыргыз% АССР NP-TOP-ASSR ;
Туркестан% АССР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Казак% АССР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Өзбек% ССР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Украина% ССР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Тажик% ССР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Татар% АССР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Каракалпак% АССР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Aзирейил NP-TOP ; ! ""
Арктика NP-TOP ; ! ""
Марс NP-TOP ; ! ""
Уран NP-TOP ; ! ""
Австрия NP-TOP ; ! ""
Англия NP-TOP ; ! ""
Антарктика NP-TOP ; ! ""
Афганистан NP-TOP ; ! ""
Бангладеш NP-TOP ; ! ""
Белгия NP-TOP ; ! ""
Болгария NP-TOP ; ! ""
Будапешт NP-TOP ; ! ""
Гана NP-TOP ; ! ""
Дания NP-TOP ; ! ""
Ереван NP-TOP ; ! ""
Индонезия NP-TOP ; ! ""
Казакстан NP-TOP ; ! ""
Кеня NP-TOP ; ! ""
Конго NP-TOP ; ! ""
Кыргызстан NP-TOP ; ! "Kyrgyzstan"
Литва NP-TOP ; ! ""
Мадрид NP-TOP ; ! ""
Мезопотамия NP-TOP ; ! ""
Франкфурт NP-TOP ; ! ""
Черногория NP-TOP ; ! ""
Өзбекстан NP-TOP ; ! "Uzbekistan"
Жалал% Абад NP-TOP ;
Кыргызмамбас NP-ORG ; ! ""
Киргизгосиздат NP-ORG ; ! "" (ru)
Ленинчил NP-ORG ; ! "" 
Кыргызокуупедмамбас NP-ORG ; ! "Kyrgyz Pedagogical State Press"
Ахмет NP-ANT-M ; ! "Axmet"
Мирлан NP-ANT-M ; ! "Mirlan"
Болот NP-ANT-M ; ! "Bolot"
Керим NP-ANT-M ;
Мухаммед NP-ANT-M ;
Манас NP-ANT-M ;
Ардак NP-ANT-M ;
Мария NP-ANT-F ; ! "Marija"
Юлия NP-ANT-F ; ! "Julija"
София NP-ANT-F ; ! "Sofija"
Ашым NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Айтматов NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Абдрахманов NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Абдуразаков NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Абдыкалыков NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Айдаров NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Акматов NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Акунов NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Алмамбетов NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Аристов NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Ауэзов NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Бактыгулов NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Белеков NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Дооров NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Жапаров NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Жумакматов NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Ибраимов NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Каназаров NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
киргизов NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Кудайбергенов NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Ломоносов NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Мамытов NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Молдокасымов NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Өмүрбеков NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Осмонкулов NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Прозоров NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Садыков NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Султанов NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Токтогулов NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Тыныбеков NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Урманбетов NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Усубакунов NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Чехов NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Шеркулов NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Эшмамбетов NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
LEXICON AdjecStems
алгачкы ADJ-ORD ; ! "first"
экинчи ADJ-ORD ; ! "second"
чакан ADJ ;
таза ADJ ;
табигый ADJ ;
борбордук ADJ ; ! "central"
байыркы ADJ ; ! "ancient"
жеке ADJ ; ! "personal"
материалдык ADJ ; ! ""
жаман ADJ ; ! "bad"
кыз ADJ ; 
бош ADJ ; 
эротикалык ADJ ; 
байкоосуз ADJ ; 
геологиялык ADJ ; 
автобиографиялык ADJ ; 
политехникалык ADJ ; 
суук ADJ ; 
технологиялык ADJ ; 
жыртык ADJ ; 
бийик ADJ ; 
жакшы ADJ ; 
тыш ADJ ; 
күчтүү ADJ ; 
контрабанда ADJ ; 
туура ADJ ; 
жашыруун ADJ ; 
либералдуу ADJ ; 
конститутсиялык ADJ ; 
белгилүү ADJ ; 
туура% эмес ADJ ; 
таттуу ADJ ; 
жооптуу ADJ ;
дезинсекциялык ADJ ; ! ""
монархиялык ADJ ; ! ""
традициялык ADJ ; ! ""
этнографиялык ADJ ; ! ""
LEXICON AdvStems
эмнеге ADV-ITG ; ! "why"
эми ADV ; ! "now"
негизинде ADV ; ! "basically, in general"
көп ADV ; 
негизи ADV ; 
мурда ADV ; 
сырткары ADV ; 
ары ADV ; 
дагы ADV ; 
бек ADV ; 
болгону ADV ; 
азыр ADV ; 
мындай ADV ; 
кандай ADV ; 
эч ADV ; 
чынында ADV ; 
тез ADV ; 
азырынча ADV ; 
аз% да% болсо ADV ; 
терсине ADV ; 
ошентип ADV ; 
жылдап ADV ; 
жогунда ADV ; 
кээде ADV ; 
жалгыз ADV ; 
тескерисинче ADV ; 
көбүнчө ADV ; 
чынында ADV ; 
досчо ADV ; 
ошондой ADV ; 
тереңине ADV ; 
дайыма ADV ; 
чогуу ADV ; 
көбүрөөк ADV ; 
анан ADV ;
